Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3375.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256B.4914, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Unit-based services with programming; component values and calculation of payment rates. (a) For the purpose of this section, unit-based services with programming include employment exploration services, employment development services, employment support services, individualized home supports with family training, individualized home supports with training, and positive support services provided to an individual outside of any service plan for a day program or residential support service. (b) Component values for unit-based services with programming are: (1) competitive workforce factor: 6.7 percent; (2) supervisory span of control ratio: 11 percent; (3) employee vacation, sick, and training allowance ratio: 8.71 percent; (4) employee-related cost ratio: 23.6 percent; (5) program plan support ratio: 15.5 percent; (6) client programming and support ratio: 4.7 percent, updated as specified in subdivision 5b; (7) general administrative support ratio: 13.25 percent; (8) program-related expense ratio: 6.1 percent; and (9) absence and utilization factor ratio: 3.9 percent. (c) A unit of service for unit-based services with programming is 15 minutes. (d) Payments for unit-based services with programming must be calculated as follows, unless the services are reimbursed separately as part of a residential support services or day program payment rate: (1) determine the number of units of service to meet a recipient's needs; (2) determine the appropriate hourly staff wage rates derived by the commissioner as provided in subdivisions 5 and 5a; (3) except for subdivision 5a, clauses (1) to (4), multiply the result of clause (2) by the product of one plus the competitive workforce factor; (4) for a recipient requiring customization for deaf and hard-of-hearing language accessibility under subdivision 12, add the customization rate provided in subdivision 12 to the result of clause (3); (5) multiply the number of direct staffing hours by the appropriate staff wage; (6) multiply the number of direct staffing hours by the product of the supervisory span of control ratio and the appropriate supervisory staff wage in subdivision 5a, clause (1); (7) combine the results of clauses (5) and (6), and multiply the result by one plus the employee vacation, sick, and training allowance ratio. This is defined as the direct staffing rate; (8) for program plan support, multiply the result of clause (7) by one plus the program plan support ratio; (9) for employee-related expenses, multiply the result of clause (8) by one plus the employee-related cost ratio; (10) for client programming and supports, multiply the result of clause (9) by one plus the client programming and support ratio; (11) this is the subtotal rate; (12) sum the standard general administrative support ratio, the program-related expense ratio, and the absence and utilization factor ratio; (13) divide the result of clause (11) by one minus the result of clause (12). This is the total payment amount; (14) for services provided in a shared manner, divide the total payment in clause (13) as follows: (i) for employment exploration services, divide by the number of service recipients, not to exceed five; (ii) for employment support services, divide by the number of service recipients, not to exceed six; (iii) for individualized home supports with training and individualized home supports with family training, divide by the number of service recipients, not to exceed three; and (iv) for night supervision, divide by the number of service recipients, not to exceed two; and (15) adjust the result of clause (14) by a factor to be determined by the commissioner to adjust for regional differences in the cost of providing services. (e) Effective January 1, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2027new text end , or upon federal approval, whichever is later, a provider must not bill more than deleted text begin three consecutive hours and not more than six total hours per daydeleted text end new text begin 2,190 hours per service authorization yearnew text end for individualized home supports with training andnew text begin not more than six total hours per day fornew text end individualized home supports with family training. deleted text begin This daily limit doesdeleted text end new text begin These limits donew text end notnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end limit a person's use of other disability waiver services, including individualized home supports, which may be provided on the same day by the same provider providing individualized home supports with training or individualized home supports with family trainingdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (2) apply to individuals who meet the residential support services criteria under sections 256B.092, subdivision 11a, and 256B.49, subdivision 29. new text end